nursery/apertium-nld-fry/apertium-nld-fry.fry.dix
    <pardef n="bûter__n_mf"><!-- mass -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="weer__n_nt"><!-- mass -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dream__n_mf">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/ân__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ân</l><r>ân<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annen</l><r>ân<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/ân__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ân</l><r>ân<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annen</l><r>ân<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/ún__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ún</l><r>ún<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unen</l><r>ún<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bern__n_nt">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fak__n_nt">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ken</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bear/s__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zen</l><r>s<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sk/oech__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>oech</l><r>oech<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uon</l><r>oech<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mem__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>men</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kop__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>pen</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="st/oel__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>oel</l><r>oel<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uollen</l><r>oel<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mi/ch__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ggen</l><r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sjoerna/al__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>al</l><r>al<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>len</l><r>al<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kwea__n_nt">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>den</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="re/ed__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r>ed<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dens</l><r>ed<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ber/ch__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gen</l><r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rê/ch__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ch</l><r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gen</l><r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fra/ach__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ach</l><r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gen</l><r>ach<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grê/f__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>f</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ven</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="apel__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kr/ús__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ús</l><r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uzen</l><r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="boat__n_nt">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/ûs__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ûs</l><r>ûs<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uzen</l><r>ûs<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bûse__n_nt">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/yk__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>yk</l><r>yk<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iken</l><r>yk<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="stri/id__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>id</l><r>id<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>den</l><r>id<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="soan__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nen</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fabr/yk__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>yk</l><r>yk<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iken</l><r>yk<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nivo__n_nt">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/ei__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ei</l><r>ei<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>agen</l><r>ei<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pa/ad__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ad</l><r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>den</l><r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="go/d__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>d</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aden</l><r>d<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lot__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ten</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wol/f__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>f</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ven</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/oer__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>oer</l><r>oer<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uorren</l><r>oer<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/oet__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>oet</l><r>oet<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uotten</l><r>oet<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/oes__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>oes</l><r>oes<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uozzen</l><r>oes<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fee__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ën</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="skrik__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ken</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ûne__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ba/arch__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>arch</l><r>arch<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rgen</l><r>arch<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tsjil__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>len</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bûter"><i>bûter</i><par n="bûter__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wetter"><i>wetter</i><par n="bûter__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="bern"><i>bern</i><par n="bern__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tiid"><i>tiid</i><par n="bûter__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="lân"><i>l</i><par n="l/ân__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="baarch"><i>ba</i><par n="ba/arch__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="bears"><i>bear</i><par n="bear/s__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="berch"><i>ber</i><par n="ber/ch__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="blei"><i>blei</i><par n="dream__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="broer"><i>br</i><par n="k/oer__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="bywurd"><i>bywurd</i><par n="boat__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="dochter"><i>dochter</i><par n="apel__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="fak"><i>fak</i><par n="fak__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fee"><i>fee</i><par n="fee__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="foet"><i>f</i><par n="f/oet__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="god"><i>go</i><par n="go/d__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="goes"><i>g</i><par n="g/oes__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="grêf"><i>grê</i><par n="grê/f__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="hope"><i>hope</i><par n="bûse__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="hân"><i>h</i><par n="h/ân__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="hûs"><i>h</i><par n="h/ûs__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ierdbei"><i>ierdbei</i><par n="dream__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="keizer"><i>keizer</i><par n="apel__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="keizerryk"><i>keizerr</i><par n="fabr/yk__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="keninkryk"><i>keninkr</i><par n="fabr/yk__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="koer"><i>k</i><par n="k/oer__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="kop"><i>kop</i><par n="kop__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="mem"><i>mem</i><par n="mem__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="beam"><i>beam</i><par n="mem__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="krite"><i>krite</i><par n="bûse__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="krús"><i>kr</i><par n="kr/ús__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kwea"><i>kwea</i><par n="kwea__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lot"><i>lot</i><par n="lot__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="kat"><i>kat</i><par n="lot__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="lyk"><i>l</i><par n="l/yk__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="middei"><i>midd</i><par n="d/ei__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="mulwurd"><i>mulwurd</i><par n="boat__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="muorre"><i>muorre</i><par n="ûne__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="nivo"><i>nivo</i><par n="nivo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="oarloch"><i>oarlo</i><par n="mi/ch__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="paad"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/ad__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="plak"><i>plak</i><par n="fak__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ploech"><i>ploe</i><par n="rê/ch__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="fraach"><i>fra</i><par n="fra/ach__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="reed"><i>re</i><par n="re/ed__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="rêch"><i>rê</i><par n="rê/ch__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="each"><i>ea</i><par n="rê/ch__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="sjoernaal"><i>sjoerna</i><par n="sjoerna/al__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skoech"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/oech__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="skrik"><i>skrik</i><par n="skrik__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="slach"><i>sla</i><par n="mi/ch__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="soan"><i>soan</i><par n="soan__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="spin"><i>spin</i><par n="soan__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="spoarwei"><i>spoarw</i><par n="d/ei__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="stirns"><i>stirn</i><par n="bear/s__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="striid"><i>stri</i><par n="stri/id__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="tean"><i>tean</i><par n="soan__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="teister"><i>teister</i><par n="apel__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="tille"><i>tille</i><par n="bûse__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tsjil"><i>tsjil</i><par n="tsjil__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="tún"><i>t</i><par n="t/ún__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="foartún"><i>foart</i><par n="t/ún__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="weer"><i>weer</i><par n="weer__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="wein"><i>wein</i><par n="dream__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wierheid"><i>wierhe</i><par n="stri/id__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wittenskip"><i>wittenskip</i><par n="kop__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wolf"><i>wol</i><par n="wol/f__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wrâldoarloch"><i>wrâldoarlo</i><par n="mi/ch__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wynmûne"><i>wynmûne</i><par n="ûne__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ûnderseeboat"><i>ûnderseeboat</i><par n="boat__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="stoel"><i>st</i><par n="st/oel__n_mf"/></e>
